Utah statutes.
63I-3-203.   Duties.

(1)  The commission shall advise the governor and the Legislature on proposals to amend the Utah Constitution, as requested by:

(a)  the governor;

(b)  the Legislature in a joint resolution of the Legislature; or

(c)  the Legislative Management Committee.

(2)  The commission shall select a chair and a vice chair from among its members.



Amended by Chapter 384, 2011 General Session

